Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 6.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2010
90-516
Transfer to Ethanol Production Incentive
Cash Fund.

The
State Treasurer shall transfer $28,016 from the Agricultural Alcohol Fuel
Tax Fund to the Ethanol Production Incentive Cash Fund on or before June 30,
2011, on such date as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division
of the Department of Administrative Services, pursuant to section 66-1334.

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB2, § 6.